Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB448.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 701(a), (a.1) heading, (1) and (4)(ii)(B) and (b) of Title 54 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 701. Court approval required for change of name.(a) General rule.--Except as set forth in subsection (b), it shall be unlawful for any person to assume a name different from the name by which such person is and has been known, unless such change in name is made pursuant to proceedings in court in accordance with subsection (a.1) or pursuant to the administrative procedures provided in subsection (a.2).(a.1) [Procedure] Court petition procedure.--12345678910111213141516171819 (1) An individual [must] may file a petition in the court of common pleas of the county in which the individual resides. If a petitioner is married, the petitioner's spouse may join as a party petitioner, in which event, upon compliance with the provisions of this subsection, the spouse shall also be entitled to the benefits of this subsection.* * *(4) At the hearing, the following apply:* * *(ii) The petitioner must present to the court all of the following:* * *[(B) An official search of the proper offices of the county where petitioner resides and of any other county where petitioner has resided within five years prior to filing the petition showing that there are no judgments, decrees of record or other similar matters against the petitioner. This clause may be satisfied by a certificate given by a corporation authorized by law to make the search under this clause.]* * *(a.2) Administrative procedure.--(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), an individual may apply for a change of name by filing an application with the Department of Health. The Department of Health shall prescribe the application form and the manners in which the form shall be filed, subject to the following:(i) An applicant may obtain and submit the application for a change of name either electronically 20250SB0448PN0411 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 through the Department of Health's publicly accessible Internet website or physically at any driver license and photo center location of the Department of Transportation of the Commonwealth, in addition to any other Department of Health location accessible to the public where the Department of Health makes available the application form.(ii) If an individual submits an application at a driver license or photo center location of the Department of Transportation, the Department of Transportation shall promptly transmit the application to the Department of Health in a secure manner to be determined by the Department of Health, in consultation with the Department of Transportation.(iii) The Department of Health shall distribute the application form to the Department of Transportation.(iv) The Department of Health shall make the following available on its publicly accessible Internet website:(A) the electronic application for a change of name;(B) the list of Department of Health locations at which an individual may obtain and submit an application; and(C) a notice that the application may be submitted at any Department of Transportation driver license or photo center location.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an individual seeking a change of name shall do so by filing a petition with the court of common pleas pursuant to the procedure under 20250SB0448PN0411 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection (a.1) if any of the following circumstances apply:(i) The application is for a change of name of a minor and the minor's parent, legal guardian or legal representative does not provide consent for the applicant's change of name. The application for a change of name of a minor may proceed under this subsection if the applicant can demonstrate to the satisfaction of the Department of Health at the conference scheduled under paragraph (4)(i) that:(A) the applicant provided notice to the nonapplying parent as required under paragraph (4)(iii) and made a reasonable attempt to obtain written and notarized consent from the nonapplying parent; and(B) there is no objection from the nonapplying parent.(ii) The applicant is unable to obtain and present the required documentation for purposes of applying for a change of name, including documentation required by the Department of Health, as prescribed by rule or regulation, to permit the Department of Health to confirm the identity of the applicant and identify the correct record of live birth to be amended.(3) The application must specify all of the following:(i) The intention to change the applicant's name.(ii) The reason for the change of name.(iii) The current residence of the applicant.(iv) Any residence of the applicant for the five years prior to the date of the application.(4) Upon filing of the application, the Department of 20250SB0448PN0411 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Health shall do all of the following:(i) Set a date for a conference on the application, which shall be held not less than one month nor more than three months after the application is filed.(ii) Seal the file. There shall be no public access to an application for a change of name or record related thereto, except that the file may be opened at the request of the applicant. Applications and records related thereto shall not be subject to access under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(iii) Direct that notice be given of the filing of the application, by certified mail, return receipt requested, to any nonapplying parent of a minor whose name may be affected by the proceedings, and notice shall include the date of the scheduled conference under subparagraph (i) and that the nonapplying parent may appear to object to the application at said conference.(5) At the conference, the following apply:(i) An individual having lawful objection to the change of name may be heard.(ii) The applicant must present to the Department of Health all of the following:(A) Proof of service of the notice under paragraph (4)(iii).(B) Any other documentation required by the Department of Health by rule or regulation to permit the Department of Health to confirm the identity of the applicant and identify the correct record of live birth to be amended.20250SB0448PN0411 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) The Department of Health may change the name as applied if the Department of Health is satisfied after the hearing that there is no lawful objection to the granting of the application.(7) Any person aggrieved by the Department of Health's determination under this subsection may appeal to the Commonwealth Court in accordance with 2 Pa.C.S. (relating to administrative law and procedure).(8) Nothing under this subsection, including electing to file an application for a change of name, shall preclude an individual from the alternative option of filing a petition for a change of name in a court of common pleas pursuant to the procedures under subsection (a.1).(9) The following words and phrases when used in this subsection shall have the meanings given to them in this paragraph unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Minor." An individual who is under 18 years of age and not emancipated.(b) Informal change of name.--Notwithstanding subsection (a), a person may adopt and use any name if the name is used consistently, nonfraudulently and exclusively. The adoption of the name shall not, however, be in contravention of the prohibitions contained in section 702(c) (relating to change by order of court) or 702.1(c) (relating to change by administrative application).Section 2. Section 702(c) of Title 54 is amended to read:§ 702. Change by order of court.* * *(c) Convicted felons.--(1) The court may order a change of name for a person 20250SB0448PN0411 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 convicted of a felony[, subject to provisions of paragraph (2),] if:(i) [at least two calendar years have elapsed from the date of completion of a person's sentence and] that person has completed the person's sentence and is not subject to the probation or parole jurisdiction of any court, county probation agency or the Pennsylvania Board of Probation and Parole; or(ii) the person has been pardoned.[(2) The court may not order a change of name for a person convicted of murder, voluntary manslaughter, rape, involuntary deviate sexual intercourse, statutory sexual assault, sexual assault, aggravated indecent assault, robbery as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3701(a)(1)(i) (relating to robbery), aggravated assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2702(a)(1) or (2) (relating to aggravated assault), arson as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3301(a) (relating to arson and related offenses), kidnapping or robbery of a motor vehicle or criminal attempt, criminal conspiracy or criminal solicitation to commit any of the offenses listed above or an equivalent crime under the laws of this Commonwealth in effect at the time of the commission of that offense or an equivalent crime in another jurisdiction.](3) The court shall notify the Office of Attorney General, the Pennsylvania State Police and the office of the district attorney of the county in which the person resides when a change of name for a person convicted of a felony has been ordered. The Pennsylvania State Police, upon receipt of this notice, shall include the change of name information in the central repository as provided for in 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 91.20250SB0448PN0411 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. Title 54 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 702.1. Change by administrative application.(a) Authorization.--The Department of Health may change the name of an individual filing an application under section 701(a.2) (relating to court approval required for change of name).(b) Procedure.--Prior to the approval of a change of name, all of the following shall apply:(1) The Department of Health must forward to the Pennsylvania State Police a duplicate copy of the application for a change of name and a set of the applicant's fingerprints. The applicant is responsible for costs under this paragraph.(2) The Pennsylvania State Police shall use the fingerprints to determine if the applicant is subject to 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 91 (relating to criminal history record information).(3) The Pennsylvania State Police shall:(i) if the applicant is subject to 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 91, note the change of name on the applicant's criminal history record information; or(ii) if the applicant is not subject to 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 91, destroy the fingerprints.(4) Within 60 days of receipt of the material under paragraph (1), the Pennsylvania State Police shall certify to the Department of Health what action has been taken under paragraph (3).(5) The procedure in this subsection shall not apply to proceedings involving:(i) An election to resume a prior surname pursuant 20250SB0448PN0411 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to section 704 (relating to divorcing and divorced person may resume prior name).(ii) A change of name involving minor children in adoption proceedings.(iii) A change of name involving a minor child whose name is being changed under section 703 (relating to effect on children) or because of the change of name of the child's parent.(c) Convicted felons.--(1) The Department of Health may order a change of name for an applicant convicted of a felony if:(i) the individual has completed the individual's sentence and is not subject to the probation or parole jurisdiction of any court, county probation agency or the Pennsylvania Board of Probation and Parole; or(ii) the individual has been pardoned.(2) The Department of Health shall notify the Office of Attorney General, the Pennsylvania State Police and the office of the district attorney of the county in which the applicant resides when a change of name for an individual convicted of a felony has been ordered. The Pennsylvania State Police, upon receipt of this notice, shall include the change of name information in the central repository as provided for in 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 91.(d) Rules and regulations.--The Department of Health may prescribe any rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this section and section 701(a.1).(e) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "minor" means an individual who is under 18 years of age and not emancipated.20250SB0448PN0411 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4. Section 703(b) of Title 54 is amended to read:§ 703. Effect on children.* * *(b) Further change on attaining majority.--Any minor child whose surname has been changed pursuant to subsection (a) upon attaining majority shall also be entitled to the benefits of [section 702 (relating to change by order of court).] sections 702 (relating to change by order of court) and 702.1 (relating to change by administrative application).Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0448PN0411 - 10 - 12345678910